California statutes. Water Code
(a) The department may also make loans to public agencies for the acquisition of interest in lands that are necessary for the construction, operation, or maintenance of a project.

(b) Loans granted pursuant to this section shall be subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The loan may be made for all or any part of the costs of acquiring interests in lands for a project that has been identified as the preferred alternative in an environmental impact report or an environmental impact statement, and the lands may become unavailable to the public agency for the purposes of developing that project.

(2) The loans shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) for each acquisition under this section.

(3) Each loan granted pursuant to this section is subject to subdivision (c) of Section 78680.12.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78680.16.

Each contract which the department enters into for a loan pursuant to Section 78680.14 shall require the sale of the interests in lands that are acquired with the loan funds if, in the department’s determination, the construction of the project has not commenced within a period of two years from the date of the first disbursement of loan funds under the contract or within any extension of such period that is granted by the department. In that event, the contract shall require that the interests in lands be offered for sale within six months from the expiration of the two-year period, or any extension thereof, and shall require that the proceeds of the sale be applied toward the repayment of the principal amount of the loan and toward the payment of the accrued interest thereon. Any remaining proceeds, after deducting the administrative costs of the public agency identified in connection with the purchase and sale of the interests in lands, shall be repaid to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78680.18.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, any land acquired with the use of loan funds made available pursuant to Section 78680.14, that is located outside the boundaries of the public agency acquiring the land and which was subject to taxation at the time of acquisition thereof, shall remain subject to taxation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78680.20.

(a) The department may adopt regulations to carry out this article. Notwithstanding any provisions of law, regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 450.1) of Division 2 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations that are in effect on November 6, 1996, may be used to carry out this article.

(b) Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Sacramento Valley Water Management and Habitat Protection Measures [78681. - 78681.10.]

78681.

(a) There is hereby created in the account the Sacramento Valley Water Management and Habitat Protection Subaccount.

(b) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the Sacramento Valley Water Management and Habitat Protection Subaccount created by subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78681.2.

The sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purpose of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78681.4.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the subaccount is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department, for programs or projects in the Sacramento Valley to assist in the implementation of the Water Quality Control Plan for the Bay-Delta adopted by the board in Resolution No. 95-24 on May 22, 1995, and as it may be amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78681.8.

The board shall provide adequate public review for proposed programs or projects and shall determine that those programs or projects are consistent with the requirements of Section 78681.4.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78681.9.

Only the programs or projects that are not the obligation of the federal Central Valley Project or the State Water Project may be funded under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78681.10.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount for the use of the department may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. River Parkway Program [78682. - 78682.6.]

78682.

(a) (1) There is hereby created in the account the River Parkway Subaccount.

(2) For the purposes of this article, “subaccount” means the River Parkway Subaccount created by paragraph (1).

(b) The sum of twenty-seven million dollars ($27,000,000) is hereby transferred from the account to the subaccount for the purpose of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78682.2.

The money in the subaccount shall be made available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the acquisition and restoration of riparian habitat, riverine aquatic habitat, and other lands in close proximity to rivers and streams and for river and stream trail projects undertaken in accordance with any of the following provisions:

(a) Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1300) and Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 1385) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code.

(b) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 31200), Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 31251), and Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 31400), of Division 21 of the Public Resources Code.

(c) Division 22.5 (commencing with Section 32500) of the Public Resources Code.

(d) Urban river park acquisition and restoration projects undertaken pursuant to Division 23 (commencing with Section 33000) of the Public Resources Code.

(e) River parkway projects undertaken by a state agency, city, county, city and county, or pursuant to a joint powers agreement between two or more of these entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78682.4.

At least 50 percent of the funds in the subaccount shall be used for projects that are located in, or in close proximity to, major metropolitan areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78682.6.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the subaccount may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. CALFED Bay-Delta Ecosystem Restoration Program [78684. - 78684.14.]

78684.

Unless the context otherwise requires, all of the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Account” means the Bay-Delta Ecosystem Restoration Account created by Section 78684.6.

(b) “Bay-delta ecosystem” means the bay-delta and its tributary watersheds.

(c) “CALFED Bay-Delta Program” or “program” means the undertaking by CALFED to develop, by means of the programmatic EIS/EIR, a preferred alternative of programs, actions, projects, and related activities which will provide solutions to identified problem areas related to the bay-delta ecosystem.

(d) (1) “Eligible project” means a project or program, or an element of a project or program, identified in the final programmatic EIS/EIR, that is intended to improve and increase aquatic and terrestrial habitats and improve ecological functions in the bay-delta ecosystem.

(2) Eligible projects may include, but are not limited to, projects or programs with any of the following purposes:

(A) The protection and enhancement of existing habitat.

(B) The restoration of tidal, shallow water, riparian, riverine, wetlands, and other habitats.

(C) The expansion of wetlands protection programs.

(D) The acquisition of water for instream flow improvements.

(E) Improved habitat management.

(F) Improved management of introduced species.

(G) Improved fish protection and management.

(3) Eligible projects shall not include any of the following:

(A) Any water conveyance facilities.

(B) Any component of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program that is not identified in the final programmatic EIS/EIR as a component of the ecosystem restoration element.

(C) Any programs or projects undertaken to offset or avoid adverse environmental conditions which the final programmatic EIS/EIR determines would be caused by the construction, operation, or implementation of any element of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program other than the ecosystem restoration element.

(e) “Programmatic EIS/EIR” means the programmatic environmental impact statement/environmental impact report that is prepared by CALFED for the CALFED Bay-Delta Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78684.2.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) CALFED is in the process of preparing a programmatic EIS/EIR for a long-term comprehensive plan that will resolve problems related to ecosystem restoration, water quality, water supplies, and water management for beneficial uses of the bay-delta ecosystem, and system integrity.

(b) The CALFED Bay-Delta Program, to the extent that it relates to restoration in the bay-delta ecosystem, is of statewide and national importance. The state should participate in the funding of eligible projects as a part of its ongoing program to improve environmental conditions in the bay-delta ecosystem.

(c) The programmatic EIS/EIR will include a schedule for funding and implementing all elements of the long-term comprehensive plan.

(d) The CALFED Bay-Delta Program elements will achieve balanced solutions in all identified problem areas, including the ecosystem, water supply, water quality, and system integrity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78684.4.

This chapter does not authorize implementation of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program or any element of the program. The implementation of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program, or any element of the program, shall only be undertaken pursuant to authority provided by law other than this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78684.6.

(a) The Bay-Delta Ecosystem Restoration Account is hereby created in the fund for the purpose of funding eligible projects. The sum of three hundred ninety million dollars ($390,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the account.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the account is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Resources Agency for the purposes set forth in this chapter, and for the administration of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78684.8.

The Secretary of the Resources Agency shall carry out this chapter in accordance with procedures established by CALFED for the purposes of ecosystem restoration until the Legislature, by statute, authorizes another entity, that is recommended by CALFED, to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78684.10.

No funds in the account may be expended until all of the following conditions have been met:

(a) The final programmatic EIS/EIR has been certified by the state lead agency and a notice of determination has been issued as required by Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(b) The identical final programmatic EIS/EIR has been filed by the federal lead agencies with the Environmental Protection Agency, the required notice has been published in the Federal Register, and there has been federal approval of the identical program approved by the state.

(c) A cost-sharing agreement has been entered into by the State of California and the United States, pursuant to which the United States agrees to share in the costs of eligible projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78684.12.

Due to the importance of issuing permits and otherwise expediting all elements of the CALFED Bay-Delta Program in a timely and balanced manner, the following procedures apply to the use of funds authorized by this chapter:

(a) After the requirements set forth in Section 78684.10 are met, funds in the account shall become available for use in accordance with the schedule for eligible projects set forth in the final programmatic EIS/EIR, unless and until the Secretary of the Resources Agency determines that the schedule established in the final programmatic EIS/EIR has not been substantially adhered to.

(b) Prior to November 15 of each year, the Secretary of the Resources Agency, in consultation with state and federal CALFED representatives and other interested persons and agencies, shall review adherence to the schedule.

(c) The absence of funding from nonfederal or nonstate sources shall not be a basis for a determination that the schedule has not been adhered to.

(d) If, at the conclusion of each annual review, the Secretary of the Resources Agency determines that the schedule established in the final programmatic EIS/EIR, or a revised schedule prepared pursuant to this subdivision, has not been substantially adhered to, the secretary, after notice to, and consultation with, state and federal CALFED representatives and other interested persons and agencies, shall prepare a revised schedule that ensures that balanced solutions in all identified problem areas, including ecosystem restoration, water supply, water quality, and system integrity are achieved, consistent with the intent of the final programmatic EIS/EIR. Funds shall be available for expenditure unless a revised schedule has not been developed within six months from the date on which the secretary determines that the prior schedule has not been substantially adhered to. Upon the preparation of any revised schedule under this subdivision, funds shall be expended in accordance with that revised schedule.

(e) Specific project and program decisions involving the expenditure of funds in the account shall be made in accordance with the procedures established by CALFED for the ecosystem restoration program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78684.14.

Not more than 3 percent of the total amount deposited in the account may be used to pay the costs incurred in connection with the administration of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Flood Control and Prevention Program [78686. - 78686.12.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [78686. - 78686.]

78686.

Unless the context otherwise requires, as used in this chapter, “account” means the Flood Control and Prevention Account created by Section 78686.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Flood Control and Prevention Program [78686.10. - 78686.12.]

78686.10.

The Flood Control and Prevention Account is hereby created in the fund. The sum of sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78686.12.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the account is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department for the purposes set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The money in the account shall be used to pay for the state’s share of the nonfederal costs of flood control and flood prevention projects that have been adopted and authorized in accordance with one or more of the following provisions of law:

(A) The State Water Resources Law of 1945 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12630) of Part 6 of Division 6).

(B) The Flood Control Law of 1946 (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12800) of Part 6 of Division 6).

(C) The California Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 12850) of Part 6 of Division 6).

(2) The money in the account may only be used to pay for costs for which valid written claims have been submitted to the department on or before June 30, 1996. Funds which are made available under this chapter shall be allocated on a pro rata basis to projects in the Counties of Contra Costa, Fresno, Kern, Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, San Diego, and Santa Clara, based on the amount of available funds relative to the total eligible claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Miscellaneous [78688. - 78688.]

78688.

Nothing in this division diminishes, or otherwise affects, the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) or the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 368.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, and approved in Prop. 204 on Nov. 5, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Fiscal Provisions [78690. - 78702.]

78690.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Fund, created by Section 78505.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78691.

Bonds in the total amount of nine hundred ninety-five million dollars ($995,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 78700, or as much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this division and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78691.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, nine million nine hundred thousand dollars ($9,900,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of Sections 78550 to 78551, inclusive, three million two hundred thousand dollars ($3,200,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of Section 78671, three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 78680, and eight million one hundred thousand dollars ($8,100,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of Section 78681.2, and eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) of the unissued bonds authorized for the purposes of Section 78530.5 are reallocated to finance the purposes of, and shall be authorized, issued, and appropriated in accordance with, Division 26.7
 (commencing with Section 79700).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 188, Sec. 4.   (AB 1471)   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 4, 2014, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78692.

(a) The bonds authorized by this division shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this division and are hereby incorporated in this division as though set forth in full in this division.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the State Water Resources Control Board is designated the ‛board.‛

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78693.

Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this division, the Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this division, the Safe, Clean, Reliable Water Supply Finance Committee is the “committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Treasurer, the Controller, and the Director of Finance, or their designated representatives. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78694.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this division in order to carry out the actions specified in this division and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78695.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78696.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this division, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 78697, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78697.

For the purposes of carrying out this division, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this division. Any amount withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest that the money would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from money received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78698.

All money deposited in the fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78699.

The State Water Resources Control Board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code for the purposes of carrying out this division. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this division. The State Water Resources Control Board shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the State Water Resources Control Board in accordance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78700.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this division includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78701.

Notwithstanding any provision of this division or the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this division that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and the investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or to take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------

78702.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this division are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 204 at the November 5, 1996, election.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 26. SAFE DRINKING WATER, CLEAN WATER, WATERSHED PROTECTION, AND FLOOD PROTECTION ACT [79000. - 79222.]



CHAPTER 1. Short Title [79000. - 79000.]

79000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the Costa-Machado Water Act of 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [79005. - 79013.]

79005.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79006.

“Bay-delta” means the San Francisco Bay/Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Estuary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79007.

“Board” means the State Water Resources Control Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79008.

“CALFED” refers to the consortium of state and federal agencies with management and regulatory responsibilities in the bay-delta that are developing a long-term solution to water management, environmental, and other problems in the bay-delta watershed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79009.

“Clean Water Act” means the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.), and includes any amendments thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79010.

“Committee” means the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Finance Committee created by Section 79212.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79011.

“Delta” means the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79012.

“Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79013.

“Fund” means the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Bond Fund created by Section 79019.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Bond Fund [79019. - 79019.]

79019.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this division shall be deposited in the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Bond Fund, which is hereby created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Safe Drinking Water Program [79020. - 79026.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [79020. - 79020.]

79020.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Federal act” means the federal Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300f et seq.), and includes any amendments thereto.

(b) “State department” means the State Department of Health Services.

(c) “Supplier” means any person, partnership, corporation, association, public agency, or other entity, including any Indian tribe having a federally recognized governing body carrying out substantial governmental duties in and powers over any area, that owns or operates a public water system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund [79021. - 79021.]

79021.

The sum of seventy million dollars ($70,000,000) is hereby transferred from the fund to the Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund created by Section 116760.30 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Safe Drinking Water Program [79022. - 79026.]

79022.

(a) The money transferred to the Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 79021, except as otherwise provided in Sections 79022.7 and 79025, shall be used by the state department for loans and grants to suppliers for the purposes of undertaking infrastructure improvements and related actions to meet safe drinking water standards, in accordance with the Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund Law of 1997 (Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 116760) of Part
 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code).

(b) A supplier that is eligible for grants under Section 300j-12(i) of the federal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1452(i)) may concurrently make application for funds annually appropriated under the federal act and for bond proceeds made available under this chapter. The state department shall not place a public water system on the priority list for project funding or enter into a contract and award a grant or loan if a supplier has previously received a grant for public water system expenditure for the same project under Section 300j-12(i) of the federal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1452(i)) or if the supplier does not have a public water system permit pursuant to Section 116525 of the Health and Safety Code. The state department may place a public water system on the priority list for funding if a supplier has not otherwise received a letter of commitment to make a grant from the Administrator of the
 Environmental Protection Agency after 180 days from the date of the original submission of an application for a grant under Section 300j-12(i) of the federal act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1452(i)).

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that Indian tribes shall be encouraged to cooperate with an adjacent public water system to determine whether the delivery of water from the public water system to the Indian tribe would be feasible and cost-effective in comparison to the improvement of a public water system owned or operated by the Indian tribe. The determination of feasibility shall include an assessment of whether the tribal water supplier possesses adequate financial, managerial, and technical capability to ensure the delivery of pure, wholesome, potable water to consumers. The Legislature further finds and declares that public water suppliers shall be encouraged to investigate opportunities for Indian tribes to deliver water beyond trust land
 boundaries to consumers that may not be economically served by a public water system.

(d) The state department shall encourage loan or grant applicants, where feasible, to consider the consolidation of small public water systems and community water systems with other public water systems to reduce the cost of service and improve the level of protection for consumers.

(e) To the extent that loans under this chapter that are made to a public water system regulated by the Public Utilities Commission bear a lower interest rate than that supplier could receive from nongovernmental sources, the Public Utilities Commission shall ensure that the entire benefit of the interest rate differential shall benefit the rate payers of that system by including the lower interest rate when establishing the water system’s weighted average cost of capital.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79022.5.

Any repayment of loans made pursuant to this article, including interest payments, and all interest earnings on or accruing to, any money resulting from the implementation of this chapter in the Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund shall be deposited in that fund and shall be available for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79022.7.

Notwithstanding Item 4260-115-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 1999 (Chapter 50, Statutes of 1999), no money transferred to the Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund pursuant to this article may be transferred to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1078, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, and approved in Prop. 13 on March 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

79023.

There is hereby created in the Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund the Technical Assistance Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79024.

Of the funds transferred pursuant to Section 79021, the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) is hereby transferred from the Safe Drinking Water State Revolving Fund to the Technical Assistance Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

79025.
